Illinois, session 104th, HB3044.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 1-105.3a and by adding Article X to Chapter 12 as 6follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/1-105.3a new)8    Sec. 1-105.3a. Autonomous vehicle. A motor vehicle that 9possesses the capability (enabled or not) for automated 10functions to control movement of the vehicle along 2 axes of 11direction simultaneously. 12    (625 ILCS 5/Ch. 12 Art. X heading new)13ARTICLE X. SPECIAL REQUIREMENTS FOR14AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES 15    (625 ILCS 5/12-1000 new)16    Sec. 12-1000. Autonomous vehicles.17    (a) Before selling or continuing to operate a new or used 18autonomous vehicle in this State and before updating the 19software or hardware of any automated driving system on such a 20vehicle, a manufacturer shall submit to the Department of 21Transportation documentation regarding the level of driving   HB3044- 2 -LRB104 08629 LNS 18681 b1automation per the guidelines set forth in document J3016 Rev 2APR2021 from the Society of American Engineers, along with a 3filing fee in an amount to be determined by the Department. The 4documentation shall include the make and model of the vehicle 5and any technical data relevant to the capabilities of the 6automated driving systems installed, regardless of whether the 7system is enabled, along with manufacturers and third party 8testing results regarding collision avoidance and detection of 9all road users including pedestrians, bicycles, motorcycles, 10equestrians, and pedestrians in wheelchairs. The manufacturer 11shall provide this data for all 4 seasons of weather and for 12performance during rain, snow, fog, nighttime, and any other 13known hazardous conditions.14    (b) The Department shall assemble an Automated Driving 15Systems Review Committee consisting of the following:16        (1) 5 Department employees with specialties in traffic 17    safety;18        (2) one representative from the public from each the 19    following:20            (A) a pedestrian access group;21            (B) a bicycle advocacy group;22            (C) a disability advocate group; and23            (D) an equestrian advocacy group; and24        (3) one representative appointed by a statewide 25    organization representing motorcyclists.26    (c) The Committee created under this Section shall review   HB3044- 3 -LRB104 08629 LNS 18681 b1the documentation provided by the manufacturer, along with any 2other publicly available documentation, including, but not 3limited to, videos, photos, advertisements, and marketing 4information about the vehicle, and make a determination 5concerning (i) the level of automated driving under document 6J3016 Rev APR2021 from the Society of American Engineers; and 7(ii) the suitability of the autonomous vehicle to be used on 8publicly accessible roads in this State. This determination 9shall be made within 30 days of the application for a new 10vehicle or updates to hardware, and 15 days for an update to 11software. The Department shall maintain a publicly available 12list of vehicles and determined level of driving automation, 13including the latest-approved hardware and software versions 14for each vehicle.15    (d) An autonomous vehicle classified as having Level 2 16Driving Automation may be sold to consumers and registered for 17use by residents in Illinois. The owner of the automated 18vehicle shall file an annual report with the Department of 19Transportation stating the number of miles driven per year, 20the estimated number of miles driven using equipped automated 21driving systems, and any collisions that occurred involving 22the vehicle. Each owner must supply proof of a filed report 23prior to renewing annual registration and upon request by a 24member of law enforcement during the normal course of a 25traffic stop or crash investigation.26    (e) An autonomous vehicle classified as having Level 3, 4,   HB3044- 4 -LRB104 08629 LNS 18681 b1or 5 Driving Automation may not be sold to consumers in this 2State. Such vehicles may be registered by a manufacturer for 3the purpose of transportation on public roads to and from 4closed circuit testing facilities within this State using 5trained drivers who are employees or contractors of the 6manufacturer. A vehicle having Level 3, 4, or 5 Driving 7Automation, including a vehicle registered in another state, 8is prohibited from using an automated driving system while on 9a public road in this State. If a vehicle having Level 3, 4, or 105 Driving Automation was sold in this State prior to the 11effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 12Assembly, then the manufacturer shall take steps to recall and 13disable all automated driving systems on the affected vehicle. 14Manufacturers, the Department of Transportation, and the 15Secretary of State shall work to identify any currently 16registered vehicles in this state that are classified as 17having Level 3, 4, or 5 Driving Automation. A manufacturer 18shall reimburse consumers for any additional costs associated 19with automated driving systems that were sold at the time of 20vehicle purchase and later disabled under this Section. 21    (f) Any resident of this State may file a request for the 22Automated Driving Systems Review Committee to review an 23existing vehicle sold or registered in this State. The request 24shall include the year, manufacturer, model, and documentation 25of automated driving systems or tools that the resident 26believes makes the vehicle subject to the requirements of this   HB3044- 5 -LRB104 08629 LNS 18681 b1Section. The Secretary of State shall receive and investigate 2complaints of a dealer selling a vehicle prohibited for sale 3under this Section.4    (g) A person operating a vehicle in violation of this 5Section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. If the vehicle is 6registered in this State, it shall be impounded by law 7enforcement until recalled and remedied by the manufacturer or 8dealer. The owner of the vehicle shall be liable for any 9impoundment fees. Any dealer offering a vehicle prohibited 10from sale or operation on roads of this State for sale or 11delivery in this State shall be fined $1,500 per day per 12individual vehicle that is offered for sale in violation of 13this Section. Any manufacturer who modifies or updates the 14software or hardware of a vehicle subject to this Section 15without submitting the modifications to the Automated Driving 16Systems Review Committee and waiting for its determination 17before making modifications shall be fined $25,000 per vehicle 18for each day the violation continues.19    (h) Autonomous vehicles that were registered with the 20Secretary of State before the effective date of this 21amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall have 90 22days after the effective date to comply with the requirements 23of this Section.